Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.18.030

Transacting business.

The activities authorized by RCW 23B.18.010 and 23B.18.020 by such nonadmitted organizations shall not constitute "transacting business" within the meaning of chapter 23B.15 RCW or Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2145; 1989 c 165 s 193.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.